en: E336(i), Monopotassium tartrate, monopotassic tartrate, Potassium bitartrate, potassium hydrogen tartrate, cream of tartar
xx: E336(i)
bg: E336(i), Монокалиев тартарат
cs: E336(i), Vinan monodraselný, Hydrogenvinan draselný, Monopotassium tartrate
da: E336(i), Monokaliumtartrat
de: E336(i), Monokaliumtartrat, Kaliumtartrat - einbasig
el: E336(i), Οξινο τρυγικο καλιο
es: E336(i), Tartrato monopotásico, bitartrato de potasio
et: E336(i), Kaaliumvesiniktartraat
fi: E336(i), Monokaliumtartraatti, Monokaliumtartraattia
fr: E336(i), Tartrate monopotassique, bitartrate de potassium, crème de tartre
hr: E336(i), monokalijev tartarat
hu: E336(i), Monokálium-tartarát
it: E336(i), Tartrato monopotassico, bitartrato di potassio
lt: E336(i), Monokalio tartratas
lv: E336(i), Monokālija tartrāts
mt: E336(i), Tartrat monopotassiku
nl: E336(i), Monokaliumtartraat, kaliumwaterstoftartraat
pl: E336(i), Winian monopotasowy, kamień winny, kwaśny winian potasu
pt: E336(i), Tartarato monopotássico, bitartarato de potássio
ro: E336(i), Tartrat monopotasic
sk: E336(i), Vínan draselný
sl: E336(i), Monokalijev tartrat
sv: E336(i), Monokaliumtartrat

en: E336(ii), Dipotassium tartrate, dipotassic tartrate, Potassium tartrate
xx: E336(ii)
bg: E336(ii), Дикалиев тартарат
ca: E336(ii), Tàrtic dipotàssic, tartàric dipotàssic
cs: E336(ii), Dipotassium tartrate
da: E336(ii), Dikaliumtartrat
de: E336(ii), Dikaliumtartrat, Kaliumtartrat
el: E336(ii), Τρυγικο καλιο
es: E336(ii), Tartrato dipotásico
et: E336(ii), Kaaliumtartraat
fa: E336(ii), پتاسیم تارترات
fi: E336(ii), Dikaliumtartraatti, Dikaliumtartraattia
fr: E336(ii), Tartrate dipotassique
hu: E336(ii), Dikálium-tartarát
it: E336(ii), Tartrato dipotassico
ja: E336(ii), 酒石酸カリウム, 酒石酸K, 酒石酸Ｋ
lt: E336(ii), Dikalio tartratas
lv: E336(ii), Dikālija tartrāts
mt: E336(ii), Tartrat dipotassiku
nl: E336(ii), Dikaliumtartraat
pl: E336(ii), Winian dipotasowy
pt: E336(ii), Tartarato dipotássico
ro: E336(ii), Tartrat dipotasic
sk: E336(ii), Vínan didraselný
sl: E336(ii), Dikalijev tartrat
sv: E336(ii), Dikaliumtartrat

en: E337, Potassium sodium tartrate
xx: E337
bg: E337, Калиево-натриев тартарат, Калиево-натриев L-(+) тартарат, рошелова сол
ca: E337, Tartrat doble de sodi i potassi
cs: E337, Vinan sodno-draselný, L(+)-vinan draselno-sodný, Rochellská sůl
da: E337, Natriumkaliumtartrat, Kaliumnatrium-L-(+)-tartrat, rochellesalt
de: E337, Kalium-natrium-tartrat, L(+)-Kalium-Natriumtartrat, Rochellesalz, Seignettesalz
el: E337, Τρυγικο καλιονατριο, L-(+)-Τρυγικό καλιονάτριο, άλας του Rochelle
es: E337, Tartrato doble de sodio y potasio, Sal de Seignette
et: E337, Kaaliumnaatriumtartraat, Kaaliumnaatrium-L-(+)-tartraat, Rochelle'i sool
fi: E337, Kaliumnatriumtartraatti, Kaliumnatrium-L(+)-tartraatti, Rochellen suola, Natriumkaliumtartraatti, Kaliumnatriumtartraattia, Kaliumnatrium-L(+)-tartraattia, Rochellen suolaa, Natriumkaliumtartraattia
fr: E337, Tartrate double de sodium et de potassium, Sel de Seignette
hu: E337, Kálium-nátrium-tartarát, Kálium-nátrium-L-(+)-tartarát, Rochelle-só, Nátrium-kálium-tartarát
it: E337, Tartrato di potassio e di sodio, Tartrato di sodio e potassio
lt: E337, Kalio natrio tartratas, Kalio natrio L-(+)-tartratas, Rochelle druska
lv: E337, Kālija nātrija tartrāts, Nātrija kālija tartrāts
mt: E337, Tartrat tas-sodju u l-potassju
nl: E337, Kaliumnatriumtartraat, Kaliumnatrium-L-(+)-tartraat, rochellezout
pl: E337, Winian potasowo-sodowy, L (+)-winian potasowo-sodowy, sól z Rochelle, Winian sodowo-potasowy
pt: E337, Tartarato de sódio e de potássio, Tartarato de sódio e potássio
ro: E337, Tartrat de sodiu și potasiu
sk: E337, Vínan draselno-sodný, L-(+)-vínan draselno-sodný, Rochellova soľ
sl: E337, Natrijev kalijev tartrat, natrijev kalijev L-(+)-tartrat, Rochellova sol
sv: E337, Kaliumnatriumtartrat, Kaliumnatrium-L(+)-tartrat, rochellesalt

en: E338, Phosphoric acid, Orthophosphoric acid, phosphoric(V) acid
xx: E338
bg: E338, Фосфорна киселина, Ортофосфорна киселина
bn: E338, ফসফরিক এসিড
bs: E338, Fosfatna kiselina
ca: E338, Àcid fosfòric, acid fosforic
cs: E338, Kyselina fosforečná, Kyselina orthofosforečná, Kyselina ortofosforečná, Kyselina orto-fosforečná, Kyselina trihydrogenfosforečná, H3PO4, Kyselina ortho-fosforečná
cy: E338, Asid ffosfforig
da: E338, Phosphorsyre, Orthophosphorsyre, Fosforsyre
de: E338, Phosphorsäure, ortho-Phosphorsäure, Orthophosphorsäure
el: E338, Φωσφορικο οξυ
eo: E338, Fosfata acido
es: E338, Ácido fosfórico, Ácido ortofosfórico, Ortofosforico, Fosfato monoamónico, Fosforico
et: E338, Fosforhape, Ortofosforhape
eu: E338, azido fosforiko
fa: E338, فسفریک اسید
fi: E338, Fosforihappo, Ortofosforihappo, Divetyfosfaatti, Vetyfosfaatti, H3PO4, Fosforihappoa, Ortofosforihappoa, Divetyfosfaattia, Vetyfosfaattia
fr: E338, Acide orthophosphorique, acide phosphorique, Sels de potassium de l'acide phosphorique, sels de potassium de E338, Phosphate d'hydrogène, Acide monophosphorique, Dihydrogénophosphate, Acide phophorique, Hydrogénophosphate, acidifiant phosphorique
ga: E338, Aigéad fosfarach
gd: E338, Ácido fosfórico
he: E338, חומצה זרחתית
hi: E338, फास्फोरिक अम्ल
hr: E338, fosforna kiselina
hu: E338, Foszforsav, Ortofoszforsav
hy: E338, օրթոֆոսֆորական թթու
id: E338, asam fosfor
it: E338, Acido fosforico, Acido ortofosforico, Acido tetraossofosforico(V), H3PO4
ja: E338, リン酸
ka: E338, ფოსფორმჟავა
kk: E338, Фосфор қышқылы
ko: E338, 인산
ky: E338, Ортофосфор кислотасы
la: E338, Ортофосфор кислотасы
lt: E338, Fosforo rūgštis, Ortofosforo rūgštis
lv: E338, Fosforskābe, Ortofosforskābe, H3PO4
mk: E338, Фосфорна киселина
mr: E338, फॉस्फरिक आम्ल
ms: E338, Asid fosforik
mt: E338, Aċidu fosforiku, Aċidu Ortofosforiku
nb: E338, Fosforsyre
ne: E338, फोस्फरिक अम्ल
nl: E338, Fosforzuur, Orthofosforzuur, Triwaterstoffosfaat, H3PO4
oc: E338, Acid fosforic
pl: E338, Kwas fosforowy, Kwas ortofosforowy, Kwas difosforowy, Kwas fosforowy(V), Kwas pirofosforowy
pt: E338, Ácido fosfórico, Ácido ortofosfórico, H3po4
ro: E338, Acid fosforic, Acid ortofosforic
sh: E338, Fosfatna kiselina
sk: E338, Kyselina fosforečná, Kyselina trihydrogenfosforečná
sl: E338, Fosforjeva (v) kislina, ortofosforjeva kislina, Fosforna kislina, H3PO4
sr: E338, фосфорна киселина
sv: E338, Fosforsyra, Ortofosforsyra, E 338
ta: E338, பாசுபாரிக் காடி
te: E338, ఫాస్పారిక్ ఆమ్లం
th: E338, กรดฟอสฟอริก
tr: E338, Fosforik asit
tt: E338, фусфыр әчелеге
uk: E338, Ортофосфорна кислота
vi: E338, Axit phôtphoric
zh: E338, 磷酸

en: E339, Sodium phosphates, sodium phosphate
xx: E339
ar: E339, فوسفات الصوديوم
bg: E339, Натриеви фосфати, натриев фосфат
ca: E339, Fosfati de sodi, Fosfats de sodi
cs: E339, Fosforečnan sodný
da: E339, Natriumphosphate, Natriumphosphat
de: E339, Natriumphosphaten, Natriumphosphat, Natriumphosphate
el: E339, Φωσφορικο νατριο
eo: E339, Natria fosfato
es: E339, Fosfatos de sodio, Fosfatos sodicos, Ortofosfatos de sodio, Fosfato de sodio, Fosfato sódico
et: E339, Naatriumfosfaat
fa: E339, سدیم فسفات
fi: E339, Natriumfosfaatit, Natriumfosfaatti, Natriumfosfaattia
fr: E339, phosphates de sodium, Orthophosphates de sodium, Orthophosphate de sodium, Phosphate de sodium
hr: E339, natrijevi fosfati
hu: E339, Nátrium-foszfátok, nátrium-foszfát
it: E339, fosfati di sodio, Fosfato di sodio
ja: E339, リン酸塩
lt: E339, Natrio fosfatas
lv: E339, Nātrija fosfāts
mt: E339, Fosfat tas-sodju
nl: E339, natriumfosfaten, Natriumorthofosfaten, Natriumfosfaat
nn: E339, natriumfosfat
pl: E339, Fosforan sodu, fosforany sodu
pt: E339, fosfatos de sódio, Fosfato de sódio
ro: E339, Fosfat de sodiu
ru: E339, Натрия фосфаты, Фосфат натрия, Ортофосфат натрия
sk: E339, Fosforečnan sodný
sl: E339, natrijev fosfat
sv: E339, Natriumfosfater, Natriumfosfat
vi: E339, Natri phosphat
zh: E339, 磷酸钠

en: E339(i), Monosodium phosphate, Monosodium monophosphate, Acid monosodium monophosphate, Monosodium orthophosphate, Monobasic sodium phosphate
xx: E339(i)
ar: E339(i), مونوسودیوم فوسفات
bg: E339(i), Мононатриев фосфат, Мононатриев монофосфат, кисел мононатриев монофосфат, мононатриев ортофосфат, едноосновен натриев фосфат
cs: E339(i), Dihydrogenfosforečnan sodný, Fosforečnan monosodný, kyselý fosforečnan sodný, orthofosforečnan monosodný
da: E339(i), Mononatriumphosphat, Mononatriummonophosphat, surt mononatriummonophosphat, mononatriumorthophosphat, monobasisk natriumphosphat
de: E339(i), Mononatriumphosphat
el: E339(i), Δισοξινο φωσφορικο νατριο, Δισόξινο ορθοφωσφορικό νάτριο
eo: E339(i), Natria bifosfato
es: E339(i), Fosfato monosódico, Monofosfato monosódico, monofosfato ácido monosódico, ortofosfato monosódico, fosfato monobásico sódico, Sodio (mono) dihidrógeno monofosfato, sodio (mono) orto-fosfato, sodio fosfato monobásico, sodio fosfato ácido, sodio bifosfato, sodio dihidrógeno fosfato, sodio (mono) dihidrógeno ortofosfato
et: E339(i), Naatriumdivesinikfosfaat, Naatriumdivesinikfosfaat
fi: E339(i), Mononatriumfosfaatti, Mononatriummonofosfaatti, Hapan mononatriummonofosfaatti, Mononatriumortofosfaatti, Yhdenarvoinen natriumfosfaatti, Mononatriumfosfaattia, Mononatriummonofosfaattia, Hapanta mononatriummonofosfaattia, Mononatriumortofosfaattia, Yhdenarvoista natriumfosfaattia
fr: E339(i), Phosphate monosodique
hu: E339(i), Mononátrium-foszfát
it: E339(i), Fosfato monosodico, Monofosfato monosodico, acido monofosfato monosodico, ortofosfato monosodico, fosfato monobasico di sodio
ja: E339(i), リン酸二水素ナトリウム
lt: E339(i), Mononatrio fosfatas
lv: E339(i), Mononātrija fosfāts
mt: E339(i), Fosfat monosodiku
nl: E339(i), Mononatriumfosfaat, Mononatriummonofosfaat, zuur mononatriummonofosfaat, mononatriumorthofosfaat, eenbasisch natriumfosfaat
pl: E339(i), Fosforan monosodowy, Monofosforan monosodowy, kwaśny monofosforan monosodowy, ortofosforan monosodowy, jednozasadowy
pt: E339(i), Fosfato monossódico, Monofosfato monossódico, monofosfato ácido monossódico, ortofosfato monossódico, fosfato de sódio monobásico
ro: E339(i), Fosfat monosodic, Monofosfat monosodic, Acid monofosfat monosodic, Ortofosfat monosodic, Fosfat de sodiu monobazic
ru: E339(i), Дигидрофосфат натрия
sh: E339(i), Mononatrijum fosfat
sk: E339(i), Fosforečnan monosodný
sl: E339(i), Mononatrijev fosfat, mononatrijev monofosfat, kisli mononatrijev monofosfat, mononatrijev ortofosfat, monobazični natrijev fosfat
sr: E339(i), Mononatrijum fosfat
sv: E339(i), Mononatriumfosfat, Mononatriummonofosfat, mononatriumortofosfat, natriumdivätefosfat
vi: E339(i), Natri đihiđrophotphat
zh: E339(i), 磷酸二氢钠

en: E339(ii), Disodium phosphate, Disodium monophosphate, Secondary sodium phosphate
xx: E339(ii)
bg: E339(ii), Динатриев фосфат, Динатриев монофосфат, вторичен натриев фосфат
cs: E339(ii), Hydrogenfosforečnan disodný, Fosforečnan disodný, sekundární fosforečnan sodný, orthofosforečnan disodný
da: E339(ii), Dinatriumphosphat, Dinatriummonophosphat, sekundært natriumphosphat
de: E339(ii), Dinatriumphosphat, Dinatriummonophosphat, sekundäres Natriumphosphat
el: E339(ii), Οξινο φωσφορικο νατριο
eo: E339(ii), Dunatria fosfato
es: E339(ii), Fosfato disódico, Monofosfato disódico, fosfato sódico secundario, Sodio (di) fosfato, sodio (di) hidrógeno monofosfato, sodio (di) hidrógeno orto-fosfato, sodio fosfato dibásico, sodio (di) fosfato ácido, sodio secundario fosfato, sodio (di) hidrógeno fosfato
et: E339(ii), Dinaatriumvesinikfosfaat, Dinaatriumvesinikfosfaat
fa: E339(ii), دی‌سدیم فسفات
fi: E339(ii), Dinatriumfosfaatti, Dinatriummonofosfaatti, Sekundaarinen natriumfosfaatti, Dinatriumfosfaattia, Dinatriummonofosfaattia, Sekundaarista natriumfosfaattia
fr: E339(ii), Phosphate disodique, Monophosphate disodique, phosphate de sodium secondaire
hr: E339(ii), dinatrijev fosfat
hu: E339(ii), Dinátrium-foszfát, Dinátrium-monofoszfát, Szekunder nátrium-foszfát
it: E339(ii), Fosfato disodico, Monofosfato disodico, fosfato secondario di sodio
ja: E339(ii), リン酸水素二ナトリウム
lt: E339(ii), Dinatrio fosfatas, Dinatrio monofosfatas, antrinis natrio fosfatas
lv: E339(ii), Dinātrija fosfāts, Dinātrija monofosfāts, Otrējais nātrija fosfāts
mt: E339(ii), Fosfat disodiku, Monofosfat disodiku, Fosfat tas-sodju sekondarju
nl: E339(ii), Dinatriumfosfaat, Dinatriummonofosfaat, secundair natriumfosfaat
pl: E339(ii), Fosforan disodowy, Monofosforan disodowy, drugorzędowy fosforan sodu
pt: E339(ii), Fosfato dissódico, Monofosfato dissódico, fosfato secundário de sódio
ro: E339(ii), Fosfat disodic, Monofosfat disodic, Fosfat secundar de sodiu
ru: E339(ii), гидрофосфат натрия
sh: E339(ii), Dinatrijum fosfat
sk: E339(ii), Fosforečnan disodný, Monofosforečnan disodný, sekundárny fosforečnan sodný
sl: E339(ii), Dinatrijev fosfat, dinatrijev monofosfat, sekundarni natrijev fosfat
sv: E339(ii), Dinatriumfosfat, Dinatriummonofosfat
ta: E339(ii), இருசோடியம் பாசுபேட்டு
vi: E339(ii), Natri hiđrophotphat
zh: E339(ii), 磷酸一氢钠

en: E339(iii), Trisodium phosphate, Tribasic sodium phosphate
xx: E339(iii)
bg: E339(iii), Тринатриев фосфат, триосновен натриев фосфат
ca: E339(iii), Fosfat de trisodi
cs: E339(iii), Fosforečnan trisodný
da: E339(iii), Trinatriumphosphat, tribasisk natriumphosphat
de: E339(iii), Trinatriumphosphat, dreibasiges Natriumphosphat
el: E339(iii), Ουδέτερο φωσφορικό νάτριο
es: E339(iii), Fosfato trisódico, fosfato tribásico sódico, Sodio (tri) fosfato, sodio (tri) monofosfato, sodio (tri) orto-fosfato, sodio fosfato tribásico, sodio fosfato
et: E339(iii), Trinaatriumfosfaat
fa: E339(iii), تری‌سدیم فسفات
fi: E339(iii), Trinatriumfosfaatti, Trinatriumfosfaattia
fr: E339(iii), Phosphate trisodique, phosphate de sodium tribasique
hu: E339(iii), Trinátrium-foszfát, Hárombázisú nátrium-foszfát
it: E339(iii), Fosfato trisodico, fosfato tribasico di sodio
ja: E339(iii), リン酸三ナトリウム
lt: E339(iii), Trinatrio fosfatas, tribazis natrio fosfatas
lv: E339(iii), Trinātrija fosfāts, Tribāziskais nātrija fosfāts
mt: E339(iii), Fosfat trisodiku, Fosfat tas-sodju tribażiku
nl: E339(iii), Trinatriumfosfaat, driebasisch natriumfosfaat
pl: E339(iii), Fosforan trisodowy, fosforan sodu trizasadowy
pt: E339(iii), Fosfato trissódico, fosfato de sódio tribásico
ro: E339(iii), Fosfat trisodic, Fosfat de sodiu tribazic
sh: E339(iii), Trinatrijum fosfat
sk: E339(iii), Fosforečnan trisodný, trojsýtny fosforečnan sodný
sl: E339(iii), Trinatrijev fosfat, tribazični natrijev fosfat
sr: E339(iii), Trinatrijum fosfat
sv: E339(iii), Trinatriumfosfat, Trinatriummonofosfat

en: E340, Potassium phosphates, potassium phosphate, E 340, E-340
xx: E340
bg: E340, Калиеви фосфати
ca: E340, Fosfat de potassi, fosfats de potassi
de: E340, Kaliumphosphat, Kaliumphosphate
es: E340, Fosfatos de potasio, Fosfato de potasio, Fosfato potásico
fi: E340, Kaliumfosfaatti, Kaliumfosfaattia, kaliumfosfaatit
fr: E340, Orthophosphates de potassium, Orthophosphate de potassium, Phosphate de potassium, Phosphates de potassium
hr: E340, kalijev fosfat, kalijevi fosfati
hu: E340, Kálium-foszfátok, kálium-foszfát
it: E340, Fosfato di potassio, Fosfati di potassio
lt: E340, Kalio fosfatai
lv: E340, Kālija fosfāti, kālija fosfāts
ms: E340, Kalium Fosfat
mt: E340, Fosfati tal-potassju, fosfat tal-potassju
nl: E340, Kaliumorthofosfaten
pl: E340, Fosforan potasu, fosforany potasu, dodatek do żywności E340
pt: E340, Fosfato de potássio, Fosfatos de potássio, fosfato de potácio, fosfatos de potácio
ro: E340, Fosfați de potasiu, fosfat de potasiu
sk: E340, Fosforečnany draselné, fosforečnan draselný
sl: E340, Kalijevi fosfati, kalijev fosfat
sv: E340, Kaliumfosfater, kaliumfosfat
tr: E340, Potasyum fosfat, Potasyum fosfatlar

en: E340(i), Monopotassium phosphate, Monobasic potassium phosphate, Monopotassium monophosphate, E340i, E 340i, E-340i, E340 i
xx: E340(i)
bg: E340(i), Монокалиев фосфат, Едноосновен калиев фосфат, монокалиев монофосфат
cs: E340(i), Dihydrogenfosforečnan draselný
da: E340(i), Monokaliumphosphat, Monobasisk kaliumphosphat, monokaliummonophosphat
de: E340(i), Monokaliumphosphat, einbasiges Kaliumphosphat, Monokaliummonophosphat
el: E340(i), Δισοξινο φωσφορικο καλιο
es: E340(i), Fosfato monopotásico, Fosfato monobásico potásico, monofosfato monopotásico
et: E340(i), Kaaliumdivesinikfosfaat, Kaaliumdivesinikfosfaat
fi: E340(i), Monokaliumfosfaatti, Yhdenarvoinen kaliumfosfaatti, Monokaliummonofosfaatti, Monokaliumfosfaattia, Yhdenarvoista kaliumfosfaattia, Monokaliummonofosfaattia
fr: E340(i), Phosphate monopotassique, Orthophosphate monopotassique, Dihydrogénophosphate de potassium, Phosphate de monopotassium
hr: E340(i), monokalijev fosfat
hu: E340(i), Monokálium-foszfát, Egybázisú kálium-foszfát, Monokálium-monofoszfát
it: E340(i), Fosfato monopotassico, Fosfato monobasico di potassio, monofosfato monopotassico
lt: E340(i), Monokalio fosfatas, Vienbazis kalio fosfatas, monokalio monofosfatas, Monokalio fosfatai
lv: E340(i), Monokālija fosfāts, Monobāziskais kālija fosfāts, Monokālija monofosfāts, Monokālija fosfāti
mt: E340(i), Fosfat monopotassiku, Fosfat tal-potassju monobażiku, Monofosfat monopotassiku
nl: E340(i), Monokaliumfosfaat, Eenbasisch kaliumfosfaat, monokaliummonofosfaat
pl: E340(i), Fosforan monopotasowy, Fosforan potasu monozasadowy, monofosforan monopotasowy
pt: E340(i), Fosfato monopotássico, Fosfato monobásico de potássio, monofosfato monopotássico
ro: E340(i), Fosfat monopotasic, Fosfat de potasiu monobazic, Monofosfat monopotasic, Fosfat monobazic de potasiu
ru: орто-Фосфат калия 3-замещенный
sk: E340(i), Fosforečnan monodraselný, Monosýtny fosforečnan draselný, monofosforečnan monodraselný, Dihydrogenfosforečnan draselný
sl: E340(i), Monokalijev fosfat, monobazični kalijev fosfat, monokalijev monofosfat
sv: E340(i), Monokaliumfosfat, Monokaliummonofosfat, kaliumortofosfat

en: E340(ii), Dipotassium phosphate, Dipotassium monophosphate, Secondary potassium phosphate, Dipotassium orthophosphate, E340ii, E 340ii, E-340ii, E340 ii
xx: E340(ii)
ar: E340(ii), دیپوتاسیوم فوسفات
bg: E340(ii), Дикалиев фосфат, Дикалиев монофосфат, вторичен калиев фосфат, дикалиев ортофосфат
cs: E340(ii), Hydrogenfosforečnan draselný
da: E340(ii), Dikaliumphosphat, Dikaliummonophosphat, sekundært kaliumphosphat, dikaliumorthophosphat
de: E340(ii), Dikaliumphosphat, Dikaliummonophosphat, sekundäres Kaliumphosphat, Dikaliumorthophosphat
el: E340(ii), Οξινο φωσφορικο καλιο, Όξινο ορθοφωσφορικό κάλιο
eo: E340(ii), Kalia fosfato dubaza
es: E340(ii), Fosfato dipotásico, Monofosfato dipotásico, fosfato potásico secundario, ortofosfato dipotásico
et: E340(ii), Dikaaliumvesinikfosfaat, Dikaaliumvesinikfosfaat
fa: E340(ii), دی‌پتاسیم فسفات
fi: E340(ii), Dikaliumfosfaatti, Dikaliummonofosfaatti, Sekundäärinen kaliumfosfaatti, Dikaliumortofosfaatti, Dikaliumfosfaattia, Dikaliummonofosfaattia, Sekundääristä kaliumfosfaattia, Dikaliumortofosfaattia
fr: E340(ii), Phosphate dipotassique, Orthophosphate dipotassique
hr: E340(ii), dikalijev fosfat
hu: E340(ii), Dikálium-foszfát, Dikálium-monofoszfát, Szekunder kálium-foszfát, Dikálium-ortofoszfát
it: E340(ii), Fosfato dipotassico, Monofosfato dipotassico, fosfato secondario di potassio, ortofosfato dipotassico
ja: E340(ii), リン酸水素二カリウム
lt: E340(ii), Dikalio fosfatas, Dikalio monofosfatas, antrinis kalio fosfatas, dikalio ortofosfatas
lv: E340(ii), Dikālija fosfāts, Dikālija monofosfāts, Otrējais kālija fosfāts, Dikālija ortofosfāts
mt: E340(ii), Fosfat dipotassiku, Monofosfat dipotassiku, Fosfat tal-potassju sekondarju, Ortofosfat dipotassiku
nl: E340(ii), Dikaliumfosfaat, Dikaliummonofosfaat, secundair kaliumfosfaat, dikaliumorthofosfaat
pl: E340(ii), Fosforan dipotasowy, Monofosforan dipotasowy, drugorzędowy fosforan potasu, ortofosforan dipotasowy
pt: E340(ii), Fosfato dipotássico, Monofosfato dipotássico, fosfato secundário de potássio, ortofosfato dipotássico, fosfato dipotéssico
ro: E340(ii), Fosfat dipotasic, Monofosfat dipotasic, Fosfat de potasiu secundar, Ortofosfat dipotasic
ru: E340(ii), Гидроортофосфат калия
sh: E340(ii), Dikalijum fosfat
sk: E340(ii), Fosforečnan didraselný
sl: E340(ii), Dikalijev fosfat, dikalijev monofosfat, sekundarni kalijev fosfat, dikalijev ortofosfat
sr: E340(ii), Dikalijum fosfat
sv: E340(ii), Dikaliumfosfat, Dikaliumortofosfat
ta: E340(ii), இருபொட்டாசியம் பாசுபேட்டு
th: E340(ii), ไดโพแทสเซียมฟอสเฟต
vi: E340(ii), Dikali photphat
zh: E340(ii), 磷酸氫二鉀

en: E340(iii), Tripotassium phosphate, tripotassium phosphate, E340iii, E 340iii, E340 iii, E-340iii, Tribasic potassium phosphate
xx: E340(iii)
bg: E340(iii), Трикалиев фосфат, Триосновен калиев фосфат
cs: E340(iii), Fosforečnan draselný, Fosforečnan tridraselný
da: E340(iii), Trikaliumphosphat, Tribasisk kaliumphosphat
de: E340(iii), Trikaliumphosphat, dreibasiges Kaliumphosphat
el: E340(iii), Φωσφορικο καλιο, Ουδέτερο φωσφορικό κάλιο
eo: E340(iii), Kalia fosfato tribaza
es: E340(iii), fosfato tripotasico, Fosfato tribásico potásico
et: E340(iii), Kaaliumfosfaat, Trikaaliumfosfaat
fa: E340(iii), تری‌پتاسیم فسفات
fi: E340(iii), Trikaliumfosfaatti, Kolmenarvoinen kaliumfosfaatti, Trikaliumfosfaattia, Kolmenarvoista kaliumfosfaattia
fr: E340(iii), Phosphate tripotassique, Orthophosphate tripotassique
hr: E340(iii), trikalijev fosfat
hu: E340(iii), Trikálium-foszfát, Hárombázisú kálium-foszfát
it: E340(iii), Fosfato tripotassico, Fosfato tribasico di potassio
ja: E340(iii), リン酸三カリウム
lt: E340(iii), Trikalio fosfatas, Tribazis kalio fosfatas
lv: E340(iii), Trikālija fosfāts, Tribāziskais kālija fosfāts
mt: E340(iii), Fosfat tat-tripotassju, Fosfat tal-potassju tribażiku
nl: E340(iii), Trikaliumfosfaat, Driebasisch kaliumfosfaat
pl: E340(iii), Fosforan tripotasowy, Fosforan potasu trizasadowy
pt: E340(iii), Fosfato tripotássico, Fosfato tribásico de potássio
ro: E340(iii), Fosfat tripotasic, Fosfat de potasiu tribazic
ru: E340(iii), Ортофосфат калия
sh: E340(iii), Trikalijum fosfat
sk: E340(iii), Fosforečnan tridraselný, Trojsýtny fosforečnan draselný
sl: E340(iii), Trikalijev fosfat, tribazični kalijev fosfat
sr: E340(iii), Trikalijum fosfat
sv: E340(iii), Trikaliumfosfat
ta: E340(iii), டிரைபொட்டாசியம் பாசுபேட்டு
zh: E340(iii), 磷酸鉀

en: E341, Calcium phosphates, calcium phosphate, calcium phosphates, E 341, E-341
xx: E341
bg: E341, Калциеви фосфати, калциев фосфат, калциеви фосфати
ca: E341, Fosfat de calci, Fosfats de calci, Fosfat càlcic, fosfat calcic
cs: E341, CaPO4
da: E341, Kalciumfosfater, kalciumfosfat
de: E341, Calciumphosphate, Calciumsalze der Orthophosphorsäure, Calciumorthophosphate, E 341
el: E341, Φωσφορικά ασβέστια, φωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E341, Fosfatos de calcio, Fosfato de calcio, Fosfato cálcico, Sales Cálcicas de Ácido Ortofosfórico
et: E341, Kaltsiumfosfaadid, kaltsiumfosfaat
fi: E341, Kalsiumfosfaatit, kalsiumfosfaatit, kalsiumfosfaatti, Kalsiumfosfaattia, kalsiumfosfaatteja
fr: E341, Phosphates de calcium, Orthophosphates de calcium, phosphates de calcium
hr: E341, kalcijevi fosfati
hu: E341, Kalcium-foszfátok, kalcium-foszfát, kalcium-foszfátok
it: E341, Fosfati di calcio, Fosfato di calcio
lt: E341, Kalcio fosfatai, kalcio fosfatas
lv: E341, Kalcija fosfāti, kalcija fosfāts
mt: E341, Fosfat tal-kalċju, fosfat tal-kalċju
nl: E341, Calciumfosfaten, Calciumorthofosfaten, calciumfosfaat
pl: E341, Fosforan wapnia, Fosforany wapnia
pt: E341, Fosfatos de cálcio, Fosfato de cálcio
ro: E341, Fosfați de calciu, fosfat de calciu
ru: E341, Фосфат кальция, Фосфаты кальция
sk: E341, Fosfáty vápnika, fosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E341, Kalcijeve fosfate, kalcijev fosfat
sv: E341, Kalciumfosfater, kalciumfosfat

en: E341(i), Monocalcium phosphate, Monobasic calcium phosphate, mono-calcium phosphate, monocalcium phosphate, E341i, E 341i, E-341i, E341 i
xx: E341(i)
ar: E341(i), فوسفات أحادي الكالسيوم
bg: E341(i), Монокалциев фосфат, Едноосновен калциев фосфат, калциев монофосфат
bn: E341(i), মনোক্যালসিয়াম ফসফেট
bs: E341(i), Monokalcij-fosfat
ca: E341(i), Fosfat de monocalci
cs: E341(i), Fosforečnan monovápenatý, Bis(dihydrogenfosforečnan) vápenatý, Fosfat de monocalci
da: E341(i), Monocalciumphosphat, Monobasisk calciumphosphat
de: E341(i), Monocalciumphosphat, einbasiges Calciumphosphat
el: E341(i), Δισοξινο φωσφορικο ασβεστιο, Μονοβασικό φωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E341(i), Fosfato monocálcico, Fosfato monobásico cálcico, fosfato monocalcico, Calcio (mono) fosfato, calcio fosfato monobásico, calcio (mono) ortofosfato, calcio fosfato monobásico, calcio bifosfato, calcio fosfato ácido, calcio dihidrógeno fosfato
et: E341(i), Kaltsiumdivesinikfosfaat, Kaltsiumdivesinikfosfaat
fa: E341(i), مونوکلسیم فسفات
fi: E341(i), Monokalsiumfosfaatti, Yhdenarvoinen kalsiumfosfaatti, Monokalsiumfosfaattia, Yhdenarvoista kalsiumfosfaattia
fr: E341(i), Phosphate monocalcique, orthophosphate monocalcique
ga: E341(i), Sárfhosfáit
hr: E341(i), monokalcijev fosfat
hu: E341(i), Monokalcium-foszfát, Egybázisú kalcium-foszfát
it: E341(i), Fosfato monocalcico, Fosfato monobasico di calcio, monocalcio fosfato
ja: E341(i), リン酸二水素カルシウム
lt: E341(i), Monokalcio fosfatas, Vienbazis kalcio fosfatas
lv: E341(i), Monokalcija fosfāts, Monobāziskais kalcija fosfāts
mt: E341(i), Fosfat monokalċiku, Fosfat tal-kalċju monobażiku
nl: E341(i), Monocalciumfosfaat, Eenbasisch calciumfosfaat
pl: E341(i), Fosforan monowapniowy, Fosforan wapnia monozasadowy
pt: E341(i), Fosfato monocálcico, Fosfato monobásico de cálcio
ro: E341(i), Fosfat monocalcic, Fosfat de calciu monobazic
ru: E341(i), Дигидроортофосфат кальция
sh: E341(i), Monokalcijum fosfat
sk: E341(i), Fosforečnan monovápenatý
sl: E341(i), Monokalcijev fosfat, monobazični kalcijev fosfat
sr: E341(i), Monokalcijum fosfat
sv: E341(i), Monokalciumfosfat
vi: E341(i), Superphosphate
zh: E341(i), 磷酸二氢钙

en: E341(ii), Dicalcium phosphate, Dibasic calcium phosphate, di-calcium phosphate, dicalcium phosphate, E341ii, E 341ii, E-341ii, E341 ii
xx: E341(ii)
ar: E341(ii), فوسفات ثنائي الكالسيوم
bg: E341(ii), Дикалциев фосфат, Двуосновен калциев фосфат
bs: E341(ii), Dikalcij-fosfat
ca: E341(ii), Fosfat de dicalci, Hidrogenfosfat de calci
cs: E341(ii), Hydrogenfosforečnan vápenatý
da: E341(ii), dicalciumfosfat, dicalciumphosphat, dibasisk calciumphosphat
de: E341(ii), Dicalciumphosphat, zweibasiges Calciumphosphat
el: E341(ii), Οξινο φωσφορικο ασβεστιο, Διβασικό φωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E341(ii), Fosfato dicálcico, Fosfato dibásico cálcico, fosfato dicálcico, Calcio (di) fosfato, calcio fosfato dibásico, calcio hidrógeno orto-fosfato, calcio fosfato dibásico, calcio secundario fosfato, calcio hidrógeno fosfato, calcio hidrógeno monofosfato
et: E341(ii), Kaltsiumvesinikfosfaat, Kaltsiumvesinikfosfaat
fa: E341(ii), دی‌کلسیم فسفات
fi: E341(ii), Dikalsiumfosfaatti, Dikalsiumfosfaattia
fr: E341(ii), Phosphate dicalcique, Phosphate de calcium dibasique
hr: E341(ii), dikalcijev fosfat
hu: E341(ii), Dikalcium-foszfát, Kétbázisú kalcium-foszfát
it: E341(ii), Fosfato dicalcico, Fosfato bibasico di calcio
ja: E341(ii), リン酸一水素カルシウム
lt: E341(ii), Dikalcio fosfatas, Dvibazis kalcio fosfatas
lv: E341(ii), Dikalcija fosfāts, Dibāziskais kalcija fosfāts
mt: E341(ii), Fosfat dikalċiku, Fosfat tal-kalċju dibażiku
nl: E341(ii), Dicalciumfosfaat, Tweebasisch calciumfosfaat
pl: E341(ii), Fosforan diwapniowy, Fosforan wapnia dizasadowy
pt: E341(ii), Fosfato dicálcico, Fosfato dibásico de cálcio
ro: E341(ii), Fosfat dicalcic, Fosfat de calciu dibazic
ru: E341(ii), Гидроортофосфат кальция
sh: E341(ii), Dikalcijum fosfat
sk: E341(ii), Fosforečnan divápenatý, Dvojsýtny fosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E341(ii), Dikalcijev fosfat, dibazični kalcijev fosfat
sr: E341(ii), Dikalcijum fosfat
sv: E341(ii), Dikalciumfosfat
vi: E341(ii), Dicanxi photphat
zh: E341(ii), 磷酸氫鈣

en: E341(iii), Tricalcium phosphate, Tricalciumphosphate, tri-calcium phosphate, tricalcium phosphate, E341iii, E 341iii, E-341iii, E341 iii
xx: E341(iii)
ar: E341(iii), فوسفات ثلاثي الكالسيوم
bg: E341(iii), Трикалциев фосфат
bs: E341(iii), Trikalcij-fosfat
ca: E341(iii), Fosfat de tricalci
cs: E341(iii), Fosforečnan vápenatý
da: E341(iii), Tricalciumphosphat
de: E341(iii), Tricalciumphosphat
el: E341(iii), Φωσφορικο ασβεστιο, Ουδέτερο φωσφορικό ασβέστιο, ορθοφωσφορικό ασβέστιο, υδροξυφωσφορικό ασβέστιο
es: E341(iii), Fosfato tricálcico, Fosfato tri-cálcico, fosfato tricálcico, Calcio (tri) fosfato, calcio fosfato tribásico, calcio fosfato precipitado, calcio fosfato
et: E341(iii), Trikaltsiumfosfaat
fa: E341(iii), تری‌کلسیم فسفات
fi: E341(iii), Trikalsiumfosfaatti, Trikalsiumfosfaattia
fr: E341(iii), Phosphate tricalcique, phosphate de tricalcium
hr: E341(iii), trikalcijev fosfat
hu: E341(iii), Trikalcium-foszfát
it: E341(iii), Tricalcium fosfato, tricalcio fosfato
ja: E341(iii), リン酸三カルシウム
ky: E341(iii), Кальций фосфаты
lt: E341(iii), Trikalcio fosfatas
lv: E341(iii), Trikalcija fosfāts
mt: E341(iii), Fosfat trikalċiku
nl: E341(iii), Tricalciumfosfaat
nn: E341(iii), trikalsiumfosfat
pl: E341(iii), Fosforan trójwapniowy
pt: E341(iii), Fosfato tricálcico
ro: E341(iii), Fosfat tricalcic, Fosfat de calciu tribazic, Ortofosfat de calciu, Monofosfat hidroxi pentacalcic
ru: E341(iii), e341iii
sh: E341(iii), Trikalcijum fosfat
sk: E341(iii), Fosforečnan trivápenatý
sl: E341(iii), Trikalcijev fosfat
sr: E341(iii), Trikalcijum fosfat
sv: E341(iii), Trikalciumfosfat, Kalciumortofosfat, pentakalciumhydroximonofosfat
uk: E341(iii), Ортофосфат кальцію
vi: E341(iii), Tricanxi photphat
zh: E341(iii), 磷酸钙

en: E342, Ammonium phosphate, monoammonium phosphate, diammonium phosphate
xx: E342
de: E342, Ammoniumphosphat
el: E342, Φωσφορικό αμμώνιο, μονοαμμώνιο φωσφορικό άλας, διαμμώνιο φωσφορικό άλας
es: E342, Fosfato de amonio, fosfato de monoamonio, fosfato de diamonio
et: E342, Ammooniumfosfaat, monoammooniumfosfaat, diammooniumfosfaat
fi: E342, Ammoniumfosfaatti, monoammoniumfosfaatti, diammoniumfosfaatti
fr: E342, Phosphates d'ammonium, Orthophosphate monoammonié, Orthophosphate diammonié
hu: E342, Ammónium-foszfát, monoammónium-foszfát, diammónium-foszfát
it: E342, Fosfato di ammonio, fosfato di monoammonio, fosfato di diammonio
lt: E342, Ammonio fosfatas, monoamonio fosfatas, diamamonio fosfatas
lv: E342, Amonija fosfāts, monoamonija fosfāts, diamonija fosfāts
mt: E342, Fosfat tal-ammonju, fosfat tal-monoammonju, fosfat tad-diammonju
nl: E342, Ammoniumfosfaat, monoammoniumfosfaat, diammoniumfosfaat
pl: E342, Fosforan amonu, fosforan monoamonu, fosforan diamonu
pt: E342, Fosfato de amónio, fosfato de monoamónio, fosfato de diamónio
ro: E342, Fosfat de amoniu, fosfat de monoamoniu, fosfat de diamoniu
sk: E342, Amóniumfosfát, monoamóniumfosfát, diamóniumfosfát
sl: E342, Amonijev fosfat, monoamonijev fosfat, diamonijev fosfat
sv: E342, Ammoniumfosfat, monoammoniumfosfat, diammoniumfosfat

en: E342(i), Ammonium dihydrogen phosphate
xx: E342(i)

en: E342(ii), Diammonium hydrogen phosphate
xx: E342(ii)

en: E343, Magnesium phosphates, magnesium phosphates, E 343, E-343
xx: E343
bg: E343, Магнезиеви фосфати
ca: E343, Fosfat de magnesi
cs: E343, Fosfáty hořečnaté
da: E343, Magnesiumfosfater
de: E343, Magnesiumphosphate, Magnesiumphosphaten
el: E343, Φωσφορικά μαγνησίου
es: E343, Fosfatos de magnesio
et: E343, Magneesiumfosfaadid
fi: E343, Magnesiumfosfaatit
fr: E343, Phosphates de magnésium, Orthophosphates de magnésium
hr: E343, magnezijevi fosfati
hu: E343, Magnézium-foszfátok
it: E343, Fosfati di magnesio
lt: E343, Magnio fosfatai
lv: E343, Magnija fosfāti
mt: E343, Fosfat tal-magni
nl: E343, Magnesiumfosfaten, Magnesiumorthofosfaten
pl: E343, Fosforany magnezu
pt: E343, Fosfatos de magnésio
ro: E343, Fosfați de magneziu
sk: E343, Fosfáty hořečnaté
sl: E343, Magnezijevi fosfati
sv: E343, Magnesiumfosfater